Maryland, session 2025, SB0507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0507*

SENATE BILL 507
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
IN A CRIMINAL PROCEEDING, EVIDENCE, INCLUDING EXPERT TESTIMONY,
CONCERNING A DIAGNOSIS FOR THE DEFENDANT OF AN AUTISM SPECTRUM
DISORDER, AS DEFINED IN THE MOST RECENT EDITION OF THE DIAGNOSTIC AND
STATISTICAL MANUAL OF MENTAL DISORDERS, OR OF A DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITY OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 7–101 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, IS ADMISSIBLE IF THE EVIDENCE:
(1) TENDS TO SHOW THAT THE DEFENDANT, AT THE TIME OF THE
ALLEGED OFFENSE, DID OR DID NOT HAVE THE MENTAL STATE REQUIRED FOR THE
OFFENSE CHARGED; AND
(2) IS OTHERWISE ADMISSIBLE UNDER THE MARYLAND RULES.
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–216.
A JUDGE OR A DISTRICT COURT COMMISSIONER SHALL CONSIDER ANY
DIAGNOSIS FOR THE DEFENDANT OF A DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY OR AN
INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 7–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE, WHEN MAKING A PRETRIAL RELEASE DETERMINATION.
Article – Health – General
7–101.
(g) “Developmental disability” means a severe chronic disability of an individual
that:
(1) Is attributable to a physical or mental impairment, other than the sole
diagnosis of mental illness, or to a combination of mental and physical impairments;
(2) Is manifested before the individual attains the age of 22;
(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(4) Results in an inability to live independently without external support
or continuing and regular assistance; and

SENATE BILL 507 3
(5) Reflects the need for a combination and sequence of special,
interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are individually planned
and coordinated for the individual.
(n) “Intellectual disability” means a developmental disability that is evidenced by
significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and impairment in the adaptive behavior
of an individual.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.